Iowa, session 2025-2026, HJR8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 37 TLSB 2468YH (5) 91 ss/ns H.J.R. 8 Section 1. REPLACEMENT AUTHORIZATION. The state of Iowa 1 authorizes the replacement of the statue of Samuel J. Kirkwood 2 with a statue honoring Governor Robert D. Ray. 3 Sec. 2. COMMITTEE CREATED. A committee of seven is created, 4 to be appointed by the governor and to serve at the pleasure 5 of the governor, to exchange the statue of Samuel J. Kirkwood 6 currently on display in the United States capitol with a statue 7 of Governor Ray. 8 1. The committee shall select its own chairperson and 9 establish its rules of procedure. The committee shall meet as 10 may be deemed necessary by the chairperson. A majority of the 11 members of the committee shall constitute a quorum. 12 2. Members shall serve without compensation or 13 reimbursement for actual expenses. 14 3. The committee shall raise all of the moneys necessary for 15 the operation of the committee; and shall solicit donations to 16 exchange the statue, commission the creation of a new statue, 17 transport the replaced statue to the Iowa capitol building, and 18 make all arrangements with the architect of the United States 19 capitol necessary for the new statue to be put into place. 20 Sec. 3. ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT. The Iowa economic 21 development authority shall provide all necessary 22 administrative support for the committee and shall administer 23 the capitol statuary fund created in this resolution. 24 Sec. 4. CAPITOL STATUARY FUND. A capitol statuary fund 25 is created in the state treasury, to be administered by the 26 Iowa economic development authority. Moneys in the fund are 27 appropriated to the authority for the purposes specified in 28 section 2 of this resolution. Any moneys remaining after 29 the exchange of statues shall be used to suitably restore 30 and relocate the Kirkwood statue. The authority may accept 31 gifts, grants, bequests, and other moneys, including but not 32 limited to state or federal moneys and in-kind contributions 33 for deposit in the fund. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 34 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 35 -1- LSB 2468YH (5) 91 ss/ns 1/ 2 H.J.R. 8 to the fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33, any unexpended or 1 unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund shall not revert but 2 shall remain available for expenditure by the authority in 3 succeeding fiscal years for the purposes specified in section 2 4 of this resolution. 5 Sec. 5. DISPLAY OF REPLACED STATUE. The department of 6 administrative services shall provide for a perpetual display 7 of the replaced statue at a suitable location within the Iowa 8 capitol building. 9